California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Secondary certificates shall be numbered consecutively and shall be used to control the time and volume of harvesting or other preparation for disposal. Secondary certificates shall accompany all deliveries of the prorated commodity by producers into a primary trade channel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59884.

In the case of any commodity which is normally concentrated for preparation for market, the marketing program committee may authorize the harvesting of the entire commodity for the purpose of delivery to a concentration point and subsequent marketing control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59885.

Primary or secondary certificates are not negotiable between producers, except with the approval of the marketing program committee and the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59886.

In the operation of any marketing program, any cooperative or other market agency which is entitled to the possession of any commodity for marketing purposes may be authorized in writing by the marketing program committee to receive certificates for producers that are represented by it and to represent its respective producers if proration is applied to the commodity while it is in the possession of such agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Amendments to Marketing Programs [59911. - 59927.]

59911.

Any amendment to a marketing program which is specified in Sections 59912 to 59921, inclusive, is a major amendment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59912.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to correlate the marketable supply of any commodity with reasonable market demands by means of volume, grade, size, variety, or time regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59913.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to fix salable and surplus percentages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59914.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to establish, maintain, and operate stabilization, surplus, or diversion—substandard pools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59915.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to create, establish, or otherwise obtain and operate any facility for the storing, financing, grading, packing, servicing, processing, preparing for market, selling, or disposing of the contents of any pools which are established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59916.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to create and disburse an equalization fund as provided for in Sections 59813 and 59814.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59917.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to broaden distribution and increase consuming outlets by educational and trade stimulation efforts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59918.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to provide for the adjustment of production of any commodity by means of tree or vine pulling.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59919.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority for carrying on research which is related to production, processing, or distribution of any commodity, that is in addition to research that is directly necessary to the administration of the marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59920.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to increase an assessment rate or fee beyond the maximum authorized by the marketing program which is in effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59921.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing program authority to extend the application of the provisions of the marketing program to portions or uses of any commodity which is not subject to such provisions or to extend the application of such provisions upon the producers of such portions or uses of any such commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59922.

A major amendment shall not be made effective unless a public hearing has been held upon it in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 59641) of this chapter for the establishment or institution of a marketing program, and the director makes both of the following findings:

(a) The amendment is in conformity with the applicable provisions and procedures of Article 5 of this chapter.

(b) The amendment is assented to in writing in the required percentages prescribed in Article 9 (commencing with Section 59851) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59923.

Minor amendments may be made to an effective marketing program upon the recommendation of not less than 75 percent of the producer members of the marketing program committee, with the approval of the director, if the director finds that such amendments are in conformity with the applicable provisions and procedures of Article 5 (commencing with Section 59641) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59924.

If the director deems it advisable, he may hold a public hearing upon minor amendments prior to such approval. Any public hearing held for this purpose shall be held within the boundaries of the proration zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59925.

The amendment of any marketing program to provide for a referendum is a minor amendment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59926.

Any modification of the provisions of any marketing program in effect for the purpose of clarifying the meaning or application of the provisions or modifying administrative procedures for carrying out the provisions is a minor amendment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59927.

If the director makes any amendment to a marketing program effective, he shall publish a notice of the effective date pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the capital of the state and in such other localities as the director may prescribe, not less than five days prior to the effective date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Funds [59941. - 59958.]

59941.

The proration zone agent for each marketing program shall collect, either for each primary certificate or for each secondary certificate, or for both, a reasonable and proportional fee to be fixed by the program committee, subject to the approval of the director, so calculated as to provide an amount which is adequate to defray the necessary expenses of instituting and carrying out the marketing program and a proper proportion of the cost of the maintenance of the department in the performance of duties which are required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59942.

Any fee for primary certificates or secondary certificates which is fixed by the program committee with the approval of the director, pursuant to this article, is due and payable by each producer upon all units of the commodity of the producer which are subject to the certificates and constitutes a personal debt of the producer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59943.

If any producer has authorized a handler to obtain secondary certificates and pay secondary certificate fees on behalf of the producer, or the handler has been a party to noncompliance with respect to payment for certificates or corresponding fees, the amounts unpaid constitute a personal debt of the handler.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59943.5.

For the convenience of collecting any producer fees which are established pursuant to this article, the director may collect such fees from the handlers of the commodity which is being regulated. Any handler that pays a fee for and on behalf of any producer may deduct the producer fee from any money which is owed by the handler to the producer. Any marketing program may require a handler to deduct producer fees from any money which is owed by the handler to the producer. Such producer fee deductions are hereby declared to be trust funds held by the handler for the purposes of the marketing program concerned and shall be timely remitted, with fee reports, to the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

59944.

The proportion of the fees which is payable to the department may vary upon a seasonal basis for each program according to the estimated expense to be incurred by the director in administering the marketing program. The amount so required shall not exceed 15 percent of the certificate fees which are collected by the proration zone agent specifically for administrative purposes, however, such 15 percent limit may be exceeded when it is approved by the program committee, and, in addition, such proportion of fees which are collected for any educational and trade stimulation marketing program as may be required by the director to administer the marketing program, which shall in no event exceed 5 percent of the fees which are collected for such purpose, unless the payment of a larger proportion of such funds is approved by the marketing program committee for the marketing program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

59945.

Upon the request of any marketing program committee, the director shall confer with the committee or its representatives prior to fixing the amount or proportion of any fees of the marketing program which are payable to the department for maintenance of the department in the performance of the duties which are required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59946.

All fees shall be deposited promptly by the proration zone agent in a bank which is approved by the Director of Finance, and shall be accounted for immediately to the Director of Food and Agriculture. Each deposit shall be made in the name of the proration zone under which the funds are collected.

Any money which is so deposited may be invested and reinvested by the Treasurer or marketing program committee in any of the securities which are described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or placed in a depository as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and handled in the same manner as money in the State Treasury. For these purposes, these moneys may also be combined with funds which are determined by the director to be available for investment pursuant to Section 58939. Any increment which is received from investment, reinvestment, or deposit made by the Treasurer shall be remitted to the marketing program committee. The Treasurer may deduct from the remittance an amount equal to the reasonable cost incurred in carrying out this section or may bill the marketing program committee for the costs, and the marketing program committee shall pay the costs from any money which is collected for it pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

59947.

(a) The funds that are deposited pursuant to Section 59946 shall be disbursed by the director or the marketing program committee, pursuant to regulations prescribed by him or her, only for the expenditures that are incurred by the marketing program committee in carrying out the specific purposes and provisions of the marketing program, including all necessary expenses that are incurred in the formulation, administration, and enforcement of the marketing program, and expenses generated by the auditing requirement imposed by subdivision (b).

(b) All expenditures shall be audited at least once every two years by one of the following means:

(1) By contract with a certified public accountant.

(2) By contract with a public accountant holding a valid permit issued by the California Board of Accountancy.

(3) By contract with a public accounting firm.

(4) By agreement with the Department of Finance.

A copy of the audit shall be delivered, within 30 days after the completion of the audit, to the Governor, the director, and the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1055, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

59948.

The proportionate amount of fees which are payable to the department shall be withdrawn from the funds monthly by the director and shall be used only for the department in carrying out its duties as required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

59949.

At the end of any marketing season as designated in each marketing program, after proper provision has been made for the payment of all necessary expense which is incurred in connection with the marketing season, any money which remains to the credit of the marketing program committee may be refunded upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom certificate fees were collected.

During any marketing season, however, the marketing program committee may, with the approval of the director, carry forward any unexpended balances for expenditure during seasons subsequent to the season during which such fees were collected. Alternatively, the refund may, upon the resolution of the marketing program committee and with the approval of the director, be deferred so as to permit the marketing program committee to use the residual funds to meet operating expenses in the succeeding season or until sufficient funds have been collected, or the collection of sufficient funds is assured, to enable the committee to make the refund and to defray the expenses of the then current marketing season, including an allowance for preliminary expenses of the next succeeding season.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59950.

At the time a refund is made, the marketing program committee shall file with the director a claim for the refund to growers that are entitled to such refund. If the director finds that as of the end of any marketing season the amount which remains to the credit of the marketing program committee is so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund, he may authorize the transfer of the funds to the then current marketing season for expenditure in carrying out the marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59951.

Unexpended balances of any money which is collected to carry out the educational and trade stimulation efforts which are provided for in Sections 59816, 59817, and 59818 which are sufficient in amount to warrant incurring the expense of making a refund shall be refunded following the termination of any marketing program which contains provisions which are authorized by those sections or following the suspension or termination of educational and trade stimulation provisions of any marketing program. The refund shall be made upon such pro rata basis as the program committee and the director determine is equitable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59952.

If the unexpended balance is so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of a pro rata refund, the director may authorize the transfer of the funds to the administrative account of the marketing program or to the Department of Agriculture Fund for the support of the department in carrying out its duties in the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59953.

Unless otherwise requested by the marketing program committee, the director is not required to issue refunds to any producer in an amount less than five dollars ($5).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

59954.

Any check or warrant which is drawn against the fund of any marketing program which remains unclaimed or uncashed for a period of six months from the date of issuance shall be canceled and the money retained for disbursement to the original payee or claimant upon satisfactory identification for a period of one year from the time the check or warrant is canceled. The money so retained, if not claimed within the period of one year, shall be credited to the then currently operating marketing program for the commodity pursuant to which the funds so retained were collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59955.

If there is no marketing program then in effective operation for the commodity, the funds shall be credited to the unexpended balance, if any, of the last previous marketing program for the commodity. If there is no marketing program then in current operation or no balance exists from any previous marketing program to which the funds may be credited, the funds so retained may be expended by the director for the benefit of any marketing program established under the provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

59956.

An agent or employee of the marketing program committee shall not have or receive any funds which are collected pursuant to this chapter until such agent or employee has filed with the director a bond in such form and in such penal sum as the director may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59957.

Upon the recommendation of the marketing program committee, the director may relieve the proration zone agent of the responsibility of collecting any amount which is due and unpaid not exceeding five dollars ($5) if the director determines that the collection is improbable or the cost of collecting would exceed the amount which is involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

59958.

The director, in addition to other remedies which are provided by law, may direct suit in the name of the people of this state as plaintiff, to be brought for the recovery of fees as provided in this chapter. In such case, the director may make the necessary affidavit for and a writ of attachment may issue. All fees collected in this manner shall be handled as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Termination of Marketing Programs [59981. - 59988.]

59981.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 59820, if any marketing program which is in active operation does not provide for a periodic referendum of producers of record with the department, directly affected by the program, for the purpose of determining whether or not the program shall be continued or modified, the director shall, prior to the beginning of a marketing season, conduct a referendum on the program at least biennially for the purpose of making the determination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59982.

An expression by a majority of the producers that participate in the referendum shall govern the action of the director in declaring a program modified, continued, or suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59983.

In conducting the referendum, the director may require the majority expression to be that of producers in terms of volume of production in addition to numbers of producers voting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59984.

After the institution of any marketing program, the program shall be terminated if there is filed with the director a petition for its termination which is signed by not less than 40 percent of the producers of the commodity in the proration zone that produced not less than 40 percent of the commodity affected that was produced within the proration zone during the last preceding season.

The signatures of the producers upon the petition shall be those of the producers whose names appear on the list which was used at the institution of the program or on any corrected list which the director has had prepared during the existence of the marketing program, or their successors in interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59985.

Each petitioner shall, upon affixing his signature to the petition for termination, write in the date of signing. No signature to the petition shall be valid for any purpose if affixed more than six months prior to the filing of the petition with the director. The petition shall be accompanied by a good and sufficient undertaking in an amount which is equal to the probable costs incident to conducting the hearing and making of findings. A hearing shall be held by the director upon the petition to determine the sufficiency of the signatures within 60 days after the presentation of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59986.

If from a check of the petition together with the facts and evidence which are adduced at the hearing, it is established that the petition to terminate is signed by the required 40 percent of the producers of the commodity in the zone that produced at least 40 percent of the proration commodity affected which was produced within the zone during the last preceding season, the director shall terminate the marketing program. Any marketing program on a seasonal commodity shall not, however, be terminated except at the end of its marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59987.

The costs incident to conducting the hearing and making of findings shall initially be paid from the funds of the program to the extent that they are available and thereafter from the undertaking. If the petition is found to be insufficiently signed, the entire cost of conducting the hearing shall be paid from the undertaking. If a program is terminated, any funds which remain for the use of the program committee that are not otherwise disposed of by this chapter shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59988.

The director may at any time initiate an investigation to determine whether or not the facts which are specified in Sections 59655 to 59662, inclusive, continue to exist. Upon a finding that any one or more of the prerequisite facts no longer exist, the director shall terminate or suspend the marketing program and may dissolve the proration zone. A program on a seasonal commodity shall not, however, be terminated or suspended except at the end of its marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Actions and Penalties [60011. - 60016.]

60011.

Any action for penalties or other remedies which is prescribed in this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

60012.

Any person that possesses, markets, handles, or transports any commodity in violation of any provision of an original or modified marketing program which is approved and made effective or in violation of any regulation which is adopted by any marketing program committee and approved by the director may be enjoined by the director, or, with the approval of the director, by the proration zone which is affected, in an action which is brought in the superior court for any county in which the violation is alleged to be occurring. There may be enjoined in the same proceeding any number of defendants that are alleged to be violating the same program although their actual violations of the marketing program may be separate and distinct and occur in different counties. In any action for injunction which is brought pursuant to this section, the procedure shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

60013.

Any person that violates a marketing program which is approved and made effective, or violates any regulation which is adopted by any program committee and approved by the director, is liable civilly in an amount of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each and every violation. That sum shall be recovered by the director or, with the approval of the director, by the proration zone which is affected, in an action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction. All sums recovered pursuant to this section shall be expended only for the necessary expenses which are incurred by the director in the administration of this chapter. Each violation during any day is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 500, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

60014.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 60015, it is a misdemeanor for:

(a) Any person to willfully render or furnish a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record required under this chapter.

(b) Any person to deliver into a primary trade channel without proper authority any commodity upon which a marketing program has been instituted.

(c) Any handler, dealer, or carrier to receive or have in its possession, within this state, without proper authority, any commodity upon which a marketing program has been instituted.

(d) Any person to deliver or to attempt to deliver any commodity that has been diverted under the provisions of any marketing program into any channel of trade except that into which diversion has been ordered.

(e) Any person to aid or abet in the commission of any of the acts which are specified in this section.

Each violation of this section constitutes a separate and distinct offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

60015.

Section 60014 does not apply to a common carrier which is operating over a regular route or between fixed termini if the shipment is made by the carrier in good faith and in accordance with its duties as a common carrier and a record of every such shipment within or from this state is kept by the carrier which shows the date of shipment, character and quality of shipment, origin and destination of the shipment, and the names of the consignor and the consignee. The record shall be open to inspection at all reasonable hours by or on the written order of the official or administrative authority that is charged with the enforcement of this chapter or any marketing program pusuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

60016.

(a) When the director makes a determination that a marketing program fee payment due pursuant to this chapter is deficient as to the payment due, the director may determine the amount of the deficiency, including any applicable penalty, as provided in this section. After giving notice that a deficiency determination is proposed and an opportunity to file a report or provide supplemental information is provided, the director may make one or more deficiency determinations of the amount due for any reporting period based on information in the director’s possession. When a business is discontinued, a deficiency determination may be made at any time thereafter as to liability arising out of the operation of that business.

The director shall give notice of the proposed deficiency determination and the notice of deficiency determination by placing the notice thereof in a sealed envelope with postage paid addressed to the person affected as it appears in the records of the marketing order or as otherwise available to the director. The giving of notice is complete at the time of deposit in the United States mail. In lieu of mailing, a notice may be served personally by delivering it to the person to be served.

Except in the case of fraud or failure to file a required return, a notice of a deficiency determination shall be given within four years of the accrual of the deficiency.

(b) The person against whom a deficiency determination is made may petition the director for redetermination within 30 days after the serving of the notice of deficiency determination. If a petition is not filed within 30 days, the deficiency determination shall become final.

A petition for redetermination shall be in writing, state the specific grounds upon which it is based, and be supported by applicable records and declarations under penalty of perjury that the information supporting the petition is accurate and complete. If a petition for redetermination is duly filed, the director shall reconsider the deficiency determination and may grant a hearing thereon. The director shall, as soon as practicable, make an order on redetermination, which shall become final 30 days after service of notice of the order of redetermination upon the petitioner. The notice of the order shall be served in the same manner as the notice of the original deficiency determination.

(c) If any amount required to be paid pursuant to a deficiency determination or redetermination is not paid within the time specified in the notice thereof, the director may, within four years thereafter, file in the Superior Court for the County of Sacramento, or the superior court of any other county, a certificate specifying the amount required to be paid, the name and address of the person liable as it appears on the records of the director, and a request that judgment be entered against the person in that amount 30 days after the filing. Notice of the filing shall be given in the same manner as for the notice of deficiency determination. The court shall enter a judgment in conformance with the director’s certificate 30 days after its filing, unless a petition for judicial review has been filed within the 30-day period.

An abstract of the judgment, or a copy thereof, may be filed with the county recorder of any county. From the time of filing of the judgment, the amount of the judgment constitutes a lien upon all of the property in the county owned by the judgment debtor. The lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the judgment, unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien imposed by this section is not valid insofar as personal property is concerned against a purchaser for value without actual knowledge of the lien.

Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon request of the director in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments, and sales shall be held under execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) The person named in a notice of deficiency determination or redetermination may, within 30 days of the notice of filing with the superior court, file an action for judicial review thereof, as provided in subdivision (c), in the Superior Court for the County of Sacramento or, with the director’s consent, the superior court of any other county where the Attorney General maintains an office. As a condition of staying entry of judgment or granting other relief, the court shall require the filing of a corporate surety bond with the director in the amount of the deficiency stated in the certificate. In any court proceeding, the certificate of the director determining the deficiency shall be prima facie evidence of the fee and the amount due and unpaid.

(e) The provisions of this section are supplemental to any other procedures for collection and imposition of fees and penalties provided by this chapter.

In lieu of proceeding pursuant to this section, the director may file a complaint for collection of unpaid fees as provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 565, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. MARKETING LAWS REGARDING PARTICULAR PRODUCTS [61301. - 63129.]



  CHAPTER 1. Marketing of Milk and Other Dairy Products [61301. - 61573.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [61301. - 61317.]

61301.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61302.

“Bulk milk” or “bulk cream” means milk or cream, respectively, which has not been pasteurized or packaged in bottles, cartons, dispenser cans, or other consumer packages, and which is handled or delivered, in bulk, in tanks, cans, or other bulk containers.

For this purpose, skim milk or cream which has been preheated or pasteurized not more than once, as provided in Section 34004 or 34005 of this code, and is handled or delivered in bulk is not pasteurized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61303.

“Consumer” means any person that buys milk, cream, or any dairy product for consumption and not for resale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61304.

“Cream” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 32504.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61305.

“Dairy product” means any product classified as Class 1 or Class 2 under Section 61932, 61933, or 61936; any frozen product or frozen product mix classified as Class 3 under Section 61934; any product classified as Class 4b under subdivision (b) of Section 61935; butter; pasteurized process cheese; and any filled product or any imitation milk product in which the use of market milk or any component of market milk is required by Section 38925. This definition applies to the designated products whether processed or manufactured in the state or outside of the state and irrespective of the classification of those products at a point of origin outside the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 58, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

61306.

(a) “Distributor” means any handler, as defined in Section 61826, and includes brokers and agents and the nonprofit cooperative associations described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 61331) of this chapter in the transactions in which such article provides that the associations are distributors. It also includes both of the following:

(1) Any person who regularly operates mobile vehicles on routes predominantly for sales of market milk, market cream, or dairy products on such routes to wholesale customers.

(2) A wholesale customer only as to milk, cream, or any dairy product that is actively and directly processed, manufactured, or packaged by such wholesale customer.

(b) Distributor does not, however, include any of the following:

(1) Any wholesale customer which is not actively and directly engaged in manufacturing, processing, or packaging milk, cream, or any dairy product.

(2) Any producer that delivers milk or cream only to a distributor or manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

61306.5.

“Educational and research activities” means any effort to develop and improve the management practices of dairy producers and processors, including, but not limited to, practices associated with the environmental sustainability of land, air quality, and water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 260, Sec. 5.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

61307.

“Manufacturing milk” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 32509.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 61401 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

61307.2.

“Manufacturing milk handler” means any person who, as owner, agent, broker, or intermediary, either directly or indirectly, receives, purchases, or otherwise acquires ownership, possession, or control of manufacturing milk in unprocessed or bulk form from a producer, a producer-handler, or another manufacturing milk handler for the purpose of manufacture, processing, sale, or other handling, regardless of whether the manufacturing milk is produced within or outside this state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 61402 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

61307.4.

“Manufacturing milk plant” means any place, structure, or building where a handler receives manufacturing milk.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 61403 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

61308.

“Manufacturer” means any person that is engaged in the business of manufacturing any dairy product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61309.

“Market milk” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 32510.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61310.

“Market cream” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 35811.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61311.

“Milk” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 32511.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61312.

“Packaged milk,” “packaged cream,” or “packaged dairy product” means market milk, market cream, or any dairy product, respectively, which is packaged in cartons, bottles, dispenser cans, or other consumer packages for sale to wholesale customers or consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

61313.

“Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, incorporated or unincorporated association, nonprofit cooperative association, nonprofit corporation, or any other business unit or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1995.)